Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 15

Presidential Elections

2-15-101. Selection of presidential electors.

At the regular November election immediately preceding the time fixed by the law of the United States for the choice of president and vice president, as many electors of president and vice president as this state may be entitled to shall be elected. Each registered voter in this state may vote for the whole number of electors. The persons, up to the number required to be chosen, having the highest number of votes shall be declared to be duly chosen electors.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1501.

Cross-References. Presidential convention delegates and presidential preference primary, see §§2-13-205, and title 2, ch. 13, part 3.

Collateral References.

Challenges to Presidential Electoral College and Electors, 20 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 183.

2-15-102. Residence requirements for electors.

For each congressional district there shall be elected one (1) elector who is a resident of the congressional district from which such elector is elected, and for the state there shall be two (2) electors who may be residents of any part of the state.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1502.

2-15-103. Duties of governor.

The governor shall perform the duties with respect to the electors required of the governor by the laws of the United States.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1503.

2-15-104. Meeting of electors.

The electors shall meet at the seat of government of this state at the time prescribed by the laws of the United States and perform the duties required of them by the laws of the United States.

The governor shall immediately deliver to the electors present a certificate of all the names of the electors.

The electors shall cast their ballots in the electoral college for the candidates of the political party which nominated them as electors if both candidates are alive.

If the presidential candidate of the party is dead or both the presidential and vice presidential candidates of the party are dead, the electors may cast their ballots in the electoral college as they see fit.

If the vice presidential candidate of the party is dead, the electors shall cast their ballots in the electoral college for the presidential candidate of the political party which nominated them as electors but may cast their ballots in the electoral college for vice president as they see fit.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1504.

2-15-105. Vacancies.

If any elector fails to appear before nine o'clock a.m. (9:00 a.m.), prevailing time, on the day on which electors are to cast their votes for president and vice president, the electors present shall, immediately and in the presence of the governor, elect any resident citizen of the state to fill such vacancy.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1505.